Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,209
Toxic chemical, defined.

Toxic chemical means a substance on the list in Committee Print Number 99-169, as amended, of the Senate Committee on Environment and Public Works, titled "Toxic Chemicals Subject to Section 313 of the Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act of 1986", including any revised version as may be made pursuant to section 313 of Title III.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 19.